utilities/dictionaries/ga_GA-Irish.dic
adharcálaim/UI
admhaínn/F
aerálaim/UI
aerálainn/J
aiceannaínn/F
aimridínn/F
airgeadaínn/F
aistarraingínn/F
altaínn/F
ansmachtaínn/F
anótálaim/UI
aothaínn/F
armálaim/UI
armálainn/J
aslaínn/F
athbhreithnínn/F
athbhútálaim/UI
athbhútálainn/J
athchognaínn/F
athchúrsálaim/UI
athchúrsálainn/J
athdheimhnínn/F
athfhuaimnínn/F
athléirínn/F
athlódálaim/UI
athlódálainn/J
athshlánaínn/F
atreisínn/F
atvuíteálaim/UI
atvuíteálainn/J
babhtálaim/USI
baghcatálaim/USI
bancálaim/USI
batrálaim/USI
bhabhtálainn/JU
bhaghcatálainn/JU
bhalbhaínn/FU
bhancálainn/JU
bhatrálainn/JU
bheagaínn/FU
bhiathaínn/FU
bhleaisteálainn/JU
bhobálainn/JU
bhochtaínn/FU
bhocálainn/JU
bhorbaínn/FU
bhordálainn/JU
bhraigeálainn/JU
bhrandálainn/JU
bhreáthaínn/FU
bhrácálainn/JU
bhréitseálainn/JU
bhuamálainn/JU
bhuanaínn/FU
bhurlálainn/JU
bhástálainn/JU
bleaisteálaim/USI
bobálaim/USI
bocálaim/USI
bordálaim/USI
braigeálaim/USI
brandálaim/USI
brácálaim/USI
bréitseálaim/USI
buamálaim/USI
burlálaim/USI
bástálaim/USI
cabálaim/USI
campálaim/USI
cantálaim/USI
ceantálaim/USI
chabhraínn/FU
chabálainn/JU
chaipitlínn/FU
chalaínn/FU
champálainn/JU
chantálainn/JU
chaomhnaínn/FU
chatalógaínn/FU
cheantálainn/JU
chearnaínn/FU
chiceálainn/JU
chiontaínn/FU
chiúálainn/JU
chlannaínn/FU
chlibeálainn/JU
chlogálainn/JU
chlutharaínn/FU
chlónálainn/JU
chnuchraínn/FU
chocálainn/JU
choigeartaínn/FU
choimrínn/FU
chomhaontaínn/FU
chomhchuingínn/FU
chomhfhreagraínn/FU
chomhréitínn/FU
chomhéignínn/FU
chonálainn/JU
chorcraínn/FU
chorrsheiceálainn/JU
chothaínn/FU
chraiceálainn/JU
chreimneálainn/JU
chriathraínn/FU
chrosphóraínn/FU
chrosálainn/JU
chróiseálainn/JU
chrónaínn/FU
chrúcálainn/JU
chuileálainn/JU
chuimsínn/FU
chumhraínn/FU
chácálainn/JU
chéadfaínn/FU
chócarálainn/JU
chóipeálainn/JU
chómhalartaínn/FU
chótálainn/JU
chúigleálainn/JU
chúnaínn/FU
chúplálainn/JU
ciceálaim/USI
ciúálaim/USI
clibeálaim/USI
clogálaim/USI
clónálaim/USI
cocálaim/USI
conálaim/USI
corrsheiceálaim/USI
craiceálaim/USI
creimneálaim/USI
crosálaim/USI
cróiseálaim/USI
crúcálaim/USI
cuileálaim/USI
cácálaim/USI
cócarálaim/USI
cóipeálaim/USI
cótálaim/USI
cúigleálaim/USI
cúplálaim/USI
d'achtálainn/JU
d'adhfhuathaínn/FU
d'aerálainn/JU
d'aibínn/FU
d'ailínínn/FU
d'airbheartaínn/FU
d'aisiompaínn/FU
d'allasaínn/FU
d'anbhainnínn/FU
d'aontaínn/FU
d'armálainn/JU
d'ascalaínn/FU
d'athainmnínn/FU
d'athbhútálainn/JU
d'athchistínn/FU
d'athchúrsálainn/JU
d'athdhearbhaínn/FU
d'athfhoilsínn/FU
d'athlonnaínn/FU
d'athlódálainn/JU
d'athraínn/FU
d'athéirínn/FU
d'atvuíteálainn/JU
d'eaglaínn/FU
d'eascainínn/FU
d'eispéirínn/FU
d'eitseálainn/JU
d'fhabhtaínn/F
d'fhannaínn/F
d'fhaoileálainn/J
d'fheidhmínn/F
d'fhionnuaraínn/F
d'fhluaraisínn/F
d'fhoinsínn/F
d'fhonsaínn/F
d'fhorlámhaínn/F
d'fhorthromaínn/F
d'fhorálainn/J
d'fhothainínn/F
d'fhriothálainn/J
d'fhruilínn/F
d'fhuathaínn/F
d'fháithimínn/F
d'fhíneálainn/J
d'fhínínn/F
d'fhóirdheonaínn/F
d'fhórsálainn/J
d'fhútrálainn/J
d'idirghníomhaínn/FU
d'imeaglaínn/FU
d'imshocraínn/FU
d'infheistínn/FU
d'inslínn/FU
d'iomardaínn/FU
d'iompórtálainn/JU
d'ionannaínn/FU
d'ionfhabhtaínn/FU
d'iontrálainn/JU
d'irisínn/FU
d'oirmhinnínn/FU
d'ordaínn/FU
d'ualaínn/FU
d'uaslódálainn/JU
d'uathfhuaimnínn/FU
d'ullmhaínn/FU
d'urraínn/FU
d'áitínn/FU
d'éagumasaínn/FU
d'éilínn/FU
d'íobraínn/FU
d'íslínn/FU
d'óstálainn/JU
dambálaim/USI
deaschliceálaim/USI
dhamnaínn/FU
dhealaínn/FU
dhearnálainn/JU
dheicrimintínn/FU
dhiagnóisínn/FU
dhifreálainn/JU
dhigitínn/FU
dhochraínn/FU
dhorchaínn/FU
dhornálainn/JU
dhraoibeálainn/JU
dhrugálainn/JU
dhumpálainn/JU
dhustálainn/JU
dhátaínn/FU
dhéileálainn/JU
dhíchobhsaínn/FU
dhíchóimeálainn/JU
dhíghníomhachtaínn/FU
dhíghrúpálainn/JU
dhíluachálainn/JU
dhímharcálainn/JU
dhíotálainn/JU
dhíphlugálainn/JU
dhíscínn/FU
dhíshuiteálainn/JU
dhóibeálainn/JU
dhúblálainn/JU
diogálaim/USI
draenálaim/USI
dreideálaim/USI
druileálaim/USI
durdálaim/USI
déchliceálaim/USI
dí-armálaim/USI
díghlasálaim/USI
díliostálaim/USI
dílódálaim/USI
díobhálaim/USI
díphacálaim/USI
díscriúálaim/USI
dízipeálaim/USI
dópálaim/USI
ealtaínn/F
easpórtálaim/UI
eisréimnínn/F
eitseálainn/J
facsálaim/USI
fhaoileálainn/JU
fheabhsaínn/FU
fhiosaínn/FU
fhoirgnínn/FU
fhormhuinínn/FU
fhorálainn/JU
fhrasaínn/FU
fhriothálainn/JU
fhuinnmhínn/FU
fhíneálainn/JU
fhíordheimhnínn/FU
fhórsálainn/JU
fhútrálainn/JU
forcálaim/USI
frainceálaim/USI
fuipeálaim/USI
fónálaim/USI
fótachóipeálaim/USI
gardálaim/USI
ghalldaínn/FU
gheafálainn/JU
ghiollaínn/FU
ghlasálainn/JU
ghlinneálainn/JU
ghníomhaínn/FU
ghothálainn/JU
ghreanálainn/JU
ghrábhálainn/JU
ghrátálainn/JU
ghréasaínn/FU
ghrúpálainn/JU
ghíorálainn/JU
ghúglálainn/JU
giosálaim/USI
gligleálaim/USI
gliúálaim/USI
grabálaim/USI
greasálaim/USI
gráinseálaim/USI
grúntálaim/USI
guailleálaim/USI
gófrálaim/USI
haigleálaim/I
iarcheanglaínn/F
iarnálainn/J
imoibrínn/F
inmhíolaínn/F
iomlánaínn/F
iompórtálaim/UI
ionphóraínn/F
ionramhálainn/J
iontrálaim/UI
labálainn/J
lainseálaim/I
lamhálainn/J
lastálaim/I
leabharmharcálainn/J
leacaínn/F
leaindeálaim/I
leictreaphlátálainn/J
linseálaim/I
liostálainn/J
liúdrálaim/I
locraínn/F
logálainn/J
luachálaim/I
ládálainn/J
láidrínn/F
láimhseálaim/I
lánseiceálainn/J
líneálaim/I
lódálainn/J
lóisteálaim/I
lónaínn/F
lúbálainn/J
lútálaim/I
maolánaínn/F
mapálainn/J
marcálaim/SI
meaitseálainn/J
measraínn/F
mhainnínn/F
mharcaínn/F
mharcálainn/J
mheirbhlínn/F
mhineastrálainn/J
mhionleasaínn/F
mhothallaínn/F
mháirseálainn/J
mhíchóirínn/F
mianaínn/F
mineastrálaim/SI
mineastrálainn/J
modraínn/F
máchailínn/F
máirseálaim/SI
máirseálainn/J
míntírínn/F
normalaínn/F
nótálaim/I
nótálainn/J
olaínn/F
pacálaim/USI
paisteálaim/USI
pasálaim/USI
phacálainn/JU
phaisteálainn/JU
phasálainn/JU
phearsanaínn/FU
phiardálainn/JU
phitseálainn/JU
phleanálainn/JU
phlugálainn/JU
phlástrálainn/JU
phléadálainn/JU
phocálainn/JU
phostálainn/JU
phrapálainn/JU
phriontálainn/JU
phrognóisínn/FU
phrásálainn/JU
phróiseálainn/JU
phumpálainn/JU
pháirceálainn/JU
phárálainn/JU
phéireálainn/JU
phíopálainn/JU
phóirseálainn/JU
phúdrálainn/JU
piardálaim/USI
pitseálaim/USI
pleanálaim/USI
plugálaim/USI
plástrálaim/USI
pléadálaim/USI
pocálaim/USI
postálaim/USI
prapálaim/USI
priontálaim/USI
prásálaim/USI
próiseálaim/USI
pumpálaim/USI
páirceálaim/USI
párálaim/USI
péireálaim/USI
píopálaim/USI
póirseálaim/USI
púdrálaim/USI
raighdeálaim/I
raighdeálainn/J
rangaínn/F
raspálaim/I
raspálainn/J
rialálaim/I
rialálainn/J
rigeálaim/I
rigeálainn/J
rinseálaim/I
rinseálainn/J
rollálaim/I
rollálainn/J
ruithnínn/F
rásálaim/I
rásálainn/J
réitínn/F
rútálaim/I
rútálainn/J
saibhseálaim/SI
saibhseálainn/J
samhraínn/F
samplálaim/SI
scaflálaim/I
scaflálainn/J
sceitseálaim/I
scinceálaim/I
scinceálainn/J
sciomraínn/F
scipeálaim/I
sciúrsálaim/I
sciúrsálainn/J
scrioblálaim/I
scroblálaim/I
scroblálainn/J
scuaideálaim/I
scátálaim/I
scátálainn/J
seamhraínn/F
seansálaim/SI
seirbheálaim/SI
seirbheálainn/J
shamplálainn/J
shaobhmhaisínn/F
sheilínn/F
shlaiseálainn/J
shligdhíbrínn/F
shnorclálainn/J
shollúnaínn/F
shuncálainn/J
sháimhrínn/F
shóinseálainn/J
shóisialaínn/F
slachtaínn/F
slaiseálainn/J
slatálaim/SI
slámálaim/SI
smeadrálainn/J
smocálaim/I
smúdálaim/I
snorclálainn/J
soinnínn/F
soncálaim/SI
spraeálaim/I
spágálainn/J
spárálaim/I
spéiceálaim/I
spúinseálainn/J
srathnaínn/F
stampálaim/I
stocálaim/I
straeálainn/J
straidhneálaim/I
struipeálaim/I
stumpálainn/J
stuálaim/I
stánaínn/F
stáplálaim/I
stíleálainn/J
stócálaim/I
suimeálaim/SI
suiteálainn/J
suncálaim/SI
svaidhpeálaim/I
sábhálainn/J
sádrálaim/SI
séimhínn/F
sórtálaim/SI
sótálainn/J
súisteálaim/SI
tapálaim/USI
tarrálaim/USI
thagraínn/FU
thapaínn/FU
tharrthálainn/JU
theistínn/FU
thiarálainn/JU
thograínn/FU
thornálainn/JU
thrasnaínn/FU
threochtálainn/JU
thrusálainn/JU
thuairgnínn/FU
thvuíteálainn/JU
théipeálainn/JU
thírdhreachtaínn/FU
tiargálaim/USI
ticeálaim/USI
tointeálaim/USI
traenálaim/USI
tranglálaim/USI
treorálaim/USI
truipeálaim/USI
trádálaim/USI
tuairteálaim/USI
tábálaim/USI
téacsálaim/USI
tíálaim/USI
uaslódálaim/UI
uathoibrínn/F
vacsaínínn/F
vearnaiseálainn/J
válsálaim/I
vótálaim/I
xéaracsálainn/J
zipeálaim/I
áirínn/F
éagnaínn/F
ídínn/F
íoslódálaim/UI
óstálainn/J
